Maine, session 132, LD1309.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §103, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 141, Pt. A, §6, is
amended to read:
1. Establishment. There is established the Public Utilities Commission, which shall
consist consists of 3 5 members.
Sec. 2. 35-A MRSA §105, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 141, Pt. A, §6, is
amended to read:
1. Appointment. The Governor shall appoint 3 5 members to the Public Utilities
Commission. At least one member must have significant experience in the field of
renewable energy development in the State and one member must have significant
experience in the field of consumer advocacy or public interest law. The appointments shall
be are subject to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over public utilities and to confirmation by the Legislature. Members of the
commission Commissioners shall devote full time to their duties.
Sec. 3. 35-A MRSA §105, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 141, Pt. A, §6,
is amended to read:
A. Each term shall end Commissioners are appointed for terms of 6 years, and each
term ends on March 31st of the 6th year of the term. The terms shall be staggered so
that one ends in 1987 and every 6 years thereafter, one ends in 1989 and every 6 years
thereafter, and one ends in 1991 and every 6 years thereafter.
Sec. 4. 35-A MRSA §108-B, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 554, §1, is amended
to read:
If the commission is unable to maintain a quorum for reasons as described in subsection
1, the Governor shall appoint 3 5 alternate commissioners who may serve as temporary
commissioners in accordance with this section.
Sec. 5. 35-A MRSA §108-B, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 554, §1, is amended
to read:
1. Selection of alternate commissioners. If 2 3 or more commissioners, due to a
conflict of interest, disability or other reason, are unable to serve in a proceeding, which
results in the commission being unable to maintain a quorum as provided under section
108‑A, the commission shall report this information to the Governor and post this
information on its publicly accessible website. Once the Governor is notified of the lack
of a quorum for a particular proceeding, the Governor shall appoint 3 5 alternate
commissioners, each of whom may serve as a temporary commissioner in that particular
proceeding. All appointed alternate commissioners must be retired judges or justices who
are subject to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over public utilities matters and to confirmation by the Legislature. Once the alternate
commissioners are confirmed by the Legislature, the commission shall, in a transparent
manner, randomly assign from the alternate commissioners one alternate commissioner to
be the first alternate commissioner, one alternate commissioner to be the 2nd alternate
commissioner and, one alternate commissioner to be the 3rd alternate commissioner, one
alternate commissioner to be the 4th alternate commissioner and one alternate
commissioner to be the 5th alternate commissioner and send this information to the
Page 1 - 132LR0678(01)

414 Governor. Following the receipt of this information, the Governor shall appoint alternate
425 commissioners as temporary commissioners in the assigned order, until the number of
436 temporary commissioners needed to reach a quorum is reached. If, for good cause, an
447 alternate commissioner is unable to serve as a temporary commissioner, the Governor shall
458 appoint the next assigned alternate as a temporary commissioner.
Sec. 6. Staggered terms; powers and duties. The commissioners serving on the
Public Utilities Commission on the effective date of this Act continue to serve until their
terms expire and successors are appointed. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 35-A, section 105, subsection 2, paragraph A, of the 2 additional appointments made
pursuant to this Act, one appointment must be made in 2026 for a term of 6 years and one
appointment must be made in 2027 for a term of 6 years.